Arkansas, session 2025, HB1215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-21-120(a), concerning definitions
regarding public school restroom and changing area designation requirements,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Athletic event" means an organized athletic activity that
is sponsored by or associated with a public school district or an open-
enrollment public charter school and in which participants are:
(A) Engaged in an athletic game or competition against
another team, club, or entity; or
(B) In practice or preparation for an organized athletic
game or competition against another team, club, or entity;
*TNL072*
02-11-2025 14:04:22 TNL072

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 S2/11/25 HB1215
(2) "Athletics personnel" means athletic directors and other
individuals actively involved in organizing, training, or coaching athletic
events for student athletes;
(1)(A)(3)(A) “Multiple occupancy restroom or changing area”
means an area in a public school district or open-enrollment public charter
school building that is designed or designated to be used by one (1) or more
individuals at the same time and in which one (1) or more individuals may be
in various stages of undress in the presence of other individuals.
(B) “Multiple occupancy restroom or changing area”
includes without limitation the following:
(i) A restroom;
(ii) A locker room;
(iii) A changing room; and
(iv) A shower room; and
(2)(A)(4)(A) “Sex” means the physical condition of being male or
female based on genetics and physiology.
(B) A public school district or open-enrollment public
charter school may rely upon a public school student's sex as identified on
his or her original birth certificate issued at or near the time of his or
her birth.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-21-120(c), concerning exceptions to the
requirement that public school restrooms and changing areas be designated
based on sex, is amended to read as follows:
(c) This section does not apply to an individual who enters a multiple
occupancy restroom or changing area designated for use by the opposite sex
when he or she enters for at least one (1) of the following circumstances:
(1) For custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes;
(2) To render emergency medical assistance; or
(3) To address an ongoing emergency, including without
limitation a physical altercation; or
(4) The individual is a coach or other athletics personnel
member who enters and is present in the multiple occupancy restroom or
changing area to address, supervise, or treat student athletes that the
individual is overseeing during a reasonable time before an athletic event,
during an athletic event, or immediately following an athletic event if:
02-11-2025 14:04:22 TNL072

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 S2/11/25 HB1215
(A) The coach or other athletics personnel member verifies
that no person is in a state of undress at any time while the coach or other
athletics personnel member is present; and
(B) An adult besides the individual who is a coach or
other athletics personnel member is present.
/s/Bentley






























02-11-2025 14:04:22 TNL072